New York, session 2025-2026, S731.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 3 of section 579 of the public 2 health law, as amended by chapter 479 of the laws of 2013, is amended to 3 read as follows: 4 (b) The department may issue a certificate of registration authorizing 5 the performance of one or more waived tests or provider-performed 6 microscopy procedures for a period of up to two years if the applicant: 7 (i) files a completed application with the department on such forms as 8 the commissioner may prescribe; (ii) provides documentation acceptable 9 to the department demonstrating the ability to comply with the require- 10 ments of this subdivision; and (iii) pays a two hundred dollar biennial 11 registration fee for each location where services are rendered; except 12 that a voluntary ambulance service and a basic life support first 13 response agency as defined in article thirty of the public health law 14 and operated under section two hundred nine-b of the general municipal 15 law shall be exempt from the requirement to pay a fee to obtain this 16 certificate of registration; and except that the following may operate 17 multiple locations under a single registration and pay a single regis- 18 tration fee: (A) not-for-profit, state or local government laboratories 19 or programs engaged in limited public health testing not exceeding 20 fifteen types of tests per registration; or (B) applicants that maintain 21 a fixed location in the state and are approved by the department to move 22 from testing site to testing site. 23 § 2. Section 3001 of the public health law is amended by adding a new 24 subdivision 22 to read as follows: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02903-01-5 S. 731 2 1 22. "Basic life support first response agency" means an agency or 2 organization determined by the department of health to be a basic life 3 support non-transporting EMS agency. 4 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.